District of Columbia statutes.
49-202

Regulations for reissue of equipment by Commanding General.

The Commanding General may transfer all public property, received by him for the use of the National Guard under the provisions of this chapter, to the several departmental officers of the general staff, and may make and prescribe regulations for its issue by them, and for its care and preservation by the officers or soldiers to whom issued.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 776, ch. 328, § 32
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 632, ch. 146, § 30

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-202.
1973 Ed., § 39-502.